California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(b) The incremental mill rate charge authorized by this section shall
 be identified as a pilot boat surcharge on the pilots’ invoices and separately accounted for in the accounting required by Section 1136. The moneys charged and collected each month from the pilot boat surcharge shall be paid to the board in accordance with Section 1194.1. The moneys shall be used only to fund pilot boat expenses in the manner established by the board pursuant to Sections 1159.1 and 1194.1.

(c) Net proceeds from the sale of existing pilot boats shall be used to reduce the debt on the new pilot boats, or applied as soon as possible against any balance of a new pilot boat, before any capitalization of the debt of the pilot’s costs in obtaining the new pilot boat, and to reduce any debt associated with the modification of pilot boats under this section. The board may adjust a pilot boat surcharge to reflect any associated
 operational savings resulting from the modification of pilot boats under this subdivision, including, but not limited to, reduced repair and maintenance expenses.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, the costs of obtaining new pilot boats includes the costs of repowering existing pilot boats or the acquisition of new pilot boats in order to meet the requirements of any rule governing the emissions of commercial harbor craft adopted by the State Air Resources Board.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the costs of obtaining new pilot boats may be authorized for identification as a pilot boat surcharge by the board prospectively for the purpose of funding the costs of compliance to meet the requirements of any commercial harbor craft regulation and may be
 collected before the imposition of costs.

(3) The board shall require a final determination of all accounting of all necessary and authorized costs upon the delivery of a new pilot boat and compare to the funding preliminarily determined to be necessary and authorized by the board to recover the pilots’ costs. All prospectively collected pilot boat surcharge revenues collected before delivery of a new pilot boat shall be identified and used to offset and reduce the costs of design, engineering, construction, and delivery of a new pilot boat, or applied as soon as possible against any balance of a new pilot boat, before any capitalization of the debt of the pilots’ costs in obtaining the new pilot boat.

(4) (A) A cost that is identified as paid and recovered
 prospectively under this subdivision before the date of delivery and operation of a pilot boat shall not be capitalized into a loan or line of credit to finance the construction of the pilot boat subject to cost recovery under this subdivision.

(B) A cost that is not identified as paid and recovered prospectively under this subdivision before the date of delivery and operation of a pilot boat may be capitalized into a loan or line of credit to finance the construction of the pilot boat subject to cost recovery under this subdivision.

(e) The board shall audit or cause to be audited all pilot boat surcharges imposed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 12.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.1.

(a) The moneys charged and collected each month from the pilot boat surcharge pursuant to Section 1194 shall be paid to the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund established pursuant to Section 1159 and credited to the Pilot Boat Surcharge Account established pursuant to Section 1159.1. The moneys shall be used only to fund the pilot boat costs of obtaining new pilot boats and of funding design and engineering modifications for the purposes of extending the service life of existing pilot boats, excluding costs for repair or maintenance, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1194, and to cover the administrative costs of the board with respect to administration of the Pilot Boat Surcharge Account, including any audits
 of the usage of the Pilot Boat Surcharge Account.

(b) Information regarding moneys remitted to the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund collected from the surcharge authorized pursuant to Section 1194, or otherwise collected by the board for that purpose, shall be made available to the public upon request and to the board or its finance committee.

(c) Funds authorized to recover pilot boat maintenance costs pursuant to Section 1190.5 are not subject to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 13.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.

(a) In addition to other fees for pilotage, there shall be a surcharge in an amount established by the board for each movement of a vessel using pilot services for each pilot trainee who is enrolled in the pilot trainee training program established by the board.

(b) The moneys charged and collected each month from the pilot trainee surcharge shall be paid to the board. The moneys shall be used only to fund the pilot trainee training program in the manner established by the board.

(c) By action of the board, the board may adjust the amount established pursuant to subdivision (a) as necessary to efficiently administer the pilot trainee training program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 468, Sec. 7.   Effective August 8, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.1.

(a) The moneys charged and collected each month from the pilot trainee surcharge pursuant to Section 1195 shall be paid to the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159. The moneys shall be used only to fund the pilot trainee training program referred to in subdivision (h) of Section 1171.5 and Section 1195.3.

(b) Information regarding moneys remitted to the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159 collected from the surcharge authorized pursuant to Section 1195, or otherwise collected by the board for that purpose, and information regarding moneys spent as pilot trainee training program expenses authorized by Section 1195.3 shall be made available to the public upon request and to the board or its finance committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.3.

Expenses of the pilot trainee program shall include all costs incurred by the board in the operation and administration of the pilot trainee training program and all costs resulting from any contracts entered into for the purchase or lease of goods and services required by the board, including, but not limited to, the costs of testing, test preparation, advertising and soliciting for trainee applicants, trainee stipends, worker’s compensation insurance premiums, reimbursement of costs of services provided to the board by other governmental entities, and for the costs for any other goods and services necessary for effectuating the purposes of training as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.

(a) In addition to other fees for pilotage, there shall be a surcharge in an amount established by the board for each movement of a vessel using pilot services for the pilot continuing education program established by the board.

(b) The moneys charged and collected each month from the pilot continuing education program surcharge shall be paid to the board. The moneys shall be used only to fund the pilot continuing education program in the manner established by the board.

(c) By action of the board, the board may adjust the amount established pursuant to subdivision (a) as necessary to efficiently administer the pilot continuing education
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 25.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.1.

(a) The moneys charged and collected each month from the pilot continuing education surcharge pursuant to Section 1196 shall be paid to the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159. The moneys shall be used only to fund the pilot continuing education program referred to in subdivision (h) of Section 1171.5 and Section 1196.3.

(b) Information regarding moneys remitted to the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159 collected from the surcharge authorized pursuant to Section 1196, or otherwise collected by the board for that purpose, and information regarding moneys spent as pilot continuing education expenses authorized by Section
 1196.3 shall be made available to the public upon request and to the board or its finance committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 26.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.3.

Pilot continuing education expenses shall include all costs incurred by the board in the operation and administration of the pilot continuing education program and all costs resulting from any contracts entered into for the purchase or lease of goods and services required by the board, including, but not limited to, the reimbursement of costs of services provided to the board by other governmental entities and for the costs for any other goods and services necessary for effectuating the purposes of continuing education as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 27.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.4.

(a) Costs resulting from the provision of continuing education for currently licensed pilots regarding instruction in the proper utilization of portable pilot unit equipment and software, if determined to be necessary for effectuating the purposes of continuing education by the board, shall be considered pilot continuing education expenses pursuant to Section 1196.3.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply only to those costs incurred after January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 8.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.5.

(a) The board shall contract with an independent entity to conduct a study of the effects of work and rest periods on psychological ability and safety for pilots. The study shall evaluate sleep- and human-related factors for pilots, and shall include information and recommendations on how to prevent pilot fatigue and ensure the safe operation of vessels.

(b) The board shall, based on the results of, and recommendations contained in, the study, promulgate regulations for pilots establishing requirements for adequate rest periods intended to prevent pilot fatigue.

(c) The study required to be conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be
 funded by revenues received by the board from the board operation surcharge, as described in Section 1159.2. The board shall have authority, consistent with Section 1159.2, to collect and appropriate adequate funding to ensure that the study is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 9.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the rates and charges for pilotage services shall not include the cost of primary marine insurance insuring a pilot, an organization of pilots, or their officers or employees, from liability arising from negligence or errors in judgment in connection with the provision of pilotage service by pilots, organizations of pilots, or their officers or employees.

(b) A pilot who holds a state license for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun shall arrange to have available, upon advance written notice, trip insurance, with coverage limits of thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000), naming as insureds the pilot, any organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, and their officers and employees, and insuring the named insureds against any civil claim, demand, suit, or action by whomsoever asserted, arising out of, or relating to, directly or indirectly, acts or omissions of the insureds in connection with the provision of pilotage service, except willful misconduct.

(c) Every vessel, owner, operator, or demise or bareboat charterer hiring a pilot with a state license for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun shall either defend, indemnify, and hold harmless pilots pursuant to paragraph (1), or alternatively, notify pilots of an intent to pay for trip insurance pursuant to paragraph (2). If a vessel or its owner, operator, or demise or bareboat charterer does not provide written notice pursuant to paragraph (2) of an intent to exercise the trip insurance option, then the vessel and its owner, operator, and demise or bareboat charterer will be deemed to have elected the obligation to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless pilots pursuant to paragraph (1).

(1) (A) Except for a vessel electing trip insurance pursuant to paragraph (2), a vessel subject to this subdivision, and its owner, operator, demise or bareboat charterer, and agent shall not assert any claim, demand, suit, or action against the pilot, any organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, and their officers and employees, for damages, including any rights over, arising out of, or connected with, directly or indirectly, any damage, loss, or expense sustained by the vessel, its owners, agents, demise or bareboat charterers, operators, or crew, or by any third parties, even if the damage results, in whole, or in part, from any act, omission, or negligence of the pilot, any organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, and their officers and employees.

(B) A vessel subject to this paragraph and its owner, operator, and demise or bareboat charterer shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the pilot, any organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, and their officers and employees, with respect to liability arising from any claim, suit, or action, by whomsoever asserted, resulting in whole, or in part, from any act, omission, or negligence of the pilot, any organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, and their officers and employees. The obligation to indemnify under this paragraph shall not apply to the extent that it causes the amount recoverable from a vessel, its owner, operator, or demise or bareboat charterer to exceed the limits of liability to which it is entitled under any bill of lading, charter party, contract of affreightment, or provision of law.

(C) The prohibition on claims by vessels, owners, operators, demise or bareboat charterers, and agents imposed by subparagraph (A) and the obligation to defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the pilot imposed by subparagraph (B) shall not apply in cases of willful misconduct by a pilot, any organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, and their officers and employees.

(D) A pilot who is the prevailing party shall be awarded attorney’s fees and costs incurred in any action to enforce a right to indemnification provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) In lieu of paragraph (1), a vessel subject to this subdivision and its owner, operator, demise or bareboat charterer, and agent may elect to notify the pilot, or the organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, of intent to pay for trip insurance, as described in subdivision (b). If notice of this election is received, in writing, by the pilot, or the organization of pilots to which the pilot belongs, at least 24 hours prior to the time pilotage services are requested, the vessel, and its owner, operator, demise or bareboat charterer, and agent are not subject to the requirements of paragraph (1). The pilot shall take all steps necessary to have trip insurance coverage in place during the vessel movement for which it is requested. The pilot shall assess to the vessel the premium for the trip insurance at the pilot’s cost, in addition to any other applicable rates and charges for the pilotage services provided.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to limit, alter, or diminish the liability of a vessel, owner, operator, or demise or bareboat charterer to any person who sustains loss or damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1199.

(a) In addition to other charges for pilotage, there shall be temporary transit fees imposed as is necessary and authorized by this section.

(b) (1) The temporary transit fee for all vessels moved across the bar except for vessels calling at San Francisco Piers 27 and 35 shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) On and after January 1, 2024, the temporary transit fee for all vessels moved across the bar shall be eight hundred fifty dollars ($850).

(c) (1) The temporary transit fee for all bay moves and all
 river moves shall be seven hundred dollars ($700).

(2) On and after January 1, 2024, the temporary transit fee for all bay moves and all river moves shall be eight hundred fifty dollars ($850).

(d) Only one temporary transit fee per invoice may be assessed.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the temporary transit fees imposed pursuant to this section are extraordinary, are not to be considered a precedential factor in any future ratesetting, and are established for the sole purpose of addressing the COVID-19 pandemic’s induced supply chain crisis and its related impacts on the pilotage system.

(f) This section shall remain operative only until the
 board publishes the first pilotage tariff under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1250), and as of the following January 1 is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 14.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Pilotage Tariff Determination and Procedures [1250. - 1281.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment of Pilotage Tariff [1250. - 1254.]

1250.

Pursuant to the requirements of this chapter, the board shall adopt, and cause to be published, a pilotage tariff that establishes fair, just, reasonable, and sufficient rates for the provision of a safe, competent, reliable, and efficient pilotage service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1251.

(a) The adopted pilotage tariff shall be determined by a formula whereby a revenue requirement is equal to the sum of pilot costs and expenses plus the product of target net income per pilot and the number of pilots.

(b) In determining target net income per pilot, all of the following factors shall be considered:

(1) The professional skills and experience required of a state-licensed pilot and the difficulty, risk, and lifestyle commitment of providing piloting services, as well as associated activities in support of the pilotage operation.

(2) Evidence of compensation for comparable maritime professions, including individuals in other state-regulated pilotage associations, at a minimum considering evidence of the compensation and benefits.

(3) Evidence of the economic and market conditions existing both locally and within the region of any pilotage association used for the purpose of comparison.

(4) Consumer price index and employment cost index.

(5) Individual amounts paid to pilots since the last rate order, or as directed.

(6) Any other factor deemed relevant to the determination of target net income per pilot.

(c) In determining the number of pilots, all of the following factors shall be considered:

(1) The number of licensed pilots determined by a hearing pursuant to Sections 1170.1 and 1170.2.

(2) The number of licensed pilots at the time of the rate hearing.

(3) Any projected changes in the number of licensed pilots.

(4) Any other factor deemed relevant to the
 determination of the number of pilots.

(d) In determining pilot costs and expenses, all of the following factors shall be considered:

(1) All costs of providing pilotage service.

(2) Any projected changes in the cost of providing pilotage service.

(3) The amount of activity, including number of vessels, size of vessels by gross registered tonnage, length, and draft.

(4) Any recent or projected changes in the amount of vessel activity.

(5) Producer price index and employment cost index.

(6) Total gross and net revenue since the last rate order, including sources of revenue by tariff category.

(7) Any other factor deemed relevant to the cost of the provision of pilotage service.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Number of pilots” means the number of pilots to be used in the formula to determine the revenue requirement.

(2) “Pilot costs and expenses” means all costs and expenses incurred by all pilots collectively in the provision of all pilotage services to be used in the formula to determine the revenue requirement.

(3) “Target
 net income per pilot” means an individual pilot’s income, including compensation and benefits, to be used in the formula to determine the revenue requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

(a) The adopted pilotage tariff may include as part of the tariff for pilotage services the reasonable costs for the setting of tariff rates under this chapter of the Office of Administrative Hearings. Those moneys generated by the tariff for the purpose of allocation to the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund and are hereby continuously appropriated, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code and without regard to fiscal year, to the board to allocate to the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(b) The costs of the board in implementing this chapter shall only be funded from revenues generated by the board operations surcharge pursuant to Section 1159.2 and continuously appropriated from the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

A petition that is submitted on the basis of a notice of intent to petition filed less than 18 months after the effective date of a pilotage tariff adopted pursuant to Section 1278 is untimely. However, if a petition is filed as a joint petition of at least two of the parties to the previous pilotage tariff hearing process and no other new intervenors present themselves in opposition to the joint petition, the petition shall be timely regardless of the effective date of the previously adopted pilotage tariff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

(a) The pilotage rates imposed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1190) shall be subject to adjustment under this chapter.

(b) The pilotage rates imposed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1190) shall remain in effect and be deemed pilotage tariffs set pursuant to this chapter until the rates are adjusted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [1255. - 1256.]

1255.

(a) The administrative adjudication provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act contained in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall apply to an adjudicative proceeding required to be conducted under this chapter, unless the requirements of this chapter relating to the proceeding provide otherwise.

(b) If there is any inconsistency between the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or Chapter 5 (commencing
 with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the provisions of this chapter shall control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Executive director” means the executive director of the board.

(b) “Intervenor” means a person with a substantial interest or representing those with a substantial interest in the pilotage tariff other than the original petitioner that an administrative law judge permits to appear and participate as a party in the rate proceeding.

(c) “Party” means
 either of the following:

(1) A person participating in the rate proceeding as a petitioner or intervenor.

(2) A person participating
 in a prepetition process as a petitioner or stakeholder.

(d) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental agency, or public or private organization.

(e) “Petitioner” means a person with a substantial interest or representing those with a substantial interest in the pilotage tariff who has filed a petition or who intends to file a petition with the board for the publication of a pilotage tariff under this chapter.

(f) “Stakeholder” means any person with
 a substantial interest or representing those with a substantial interest in the pilotage tariff regardless of whether the person is participating as a petitioner or intervenor.

(g) “Substantial interest in the pilotage tariff” means any direct or indirect financial interest in the rates and tariffs charged for pilotage services.

(h) “Tariff” means the schedule of rates, fees, and charges applied to the provision of pilotage services as published by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prepetition Procedures [1260. - 1262.]

1260.

(a) Any person intending to petition to request a change in pilotage rates shall file a notice of intent to petition with the board, with a copy served to interested stakeholders including any association of board-licensed pilots, any association representing the interests of vessel owners or operators, and any other person that participated in the most recent past rate proceedings as a party.

(b) The notice of intent to petition shall contain an explanation of the proposed change,
 including a description of each change of a rate or inclusion of a new cost item not previously included in the current pilotage tariff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

Upon receipt of a notice of intent to petition, the executive director shall do all of the following:

(a) Schedule an item for the next regular meeting of the board for the purposes of providing notice to the public and interested stakeholders and for the executive director to publish the notice of intent to petition into the record.

(b) Notify the director of the Office of Administrative Hearings of the notice of intent to petition and request the assignment of an administrative law judge pursuant to Section 11370.3 of the Government Code to the board for the purpose of administering a hearing on any subsequently filed
 petition.

(c) Notify the petitioner of any stakeholder who has communicated a request to participate in prepetition meetings to the executive director prior to the notice requirement deadline established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 1262.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

(a) Within 20 days of publication of the notice of intent to petition at a duly noticed meeting of the board, the filing petitioner shall provide a notice of a proposed meeting schedule to all interested stakeholders for the purposes of holding a meeting or series of prepetition meetings for the purposes described in this section.

(b) Within 45 days of provision of service of a copy of the notice of intent to petition or the reading of the notice of intent to petition at a duly noticed meeting of the board, whichever is earlier, the filing petitioner shall hold at least one meeting with all interested stakeholders.

(c) All parties shall make a good faith effort to schedule as many meetings as reasonably necessary to achieve the purpose of the meetings during the notice of intent to petition period.

(d) The purpose of the meetings during the notice of intent to petition period shall be to clarify the issues presented in the notice of intent to petition, to explore means of narrowing and simplifying the issues as much as possible, and to consider areas of substantive agreement and substantive
 disagreement.

(e) All parties shall identify the potential for joint stipulations, joint petition, or partial stipulation on issues and joint petition during prepetition meetings.

(f) Interested parties may choose amongst themselves to arrange meetings at their own discretion and cost, including arrangements for mediators or alternative dispute resolution processes if desired.

(g) The prepetition meetings required pursuant to this section are not public meetings. Public notice of these meetings is not required other than as described in this section.

(h) Members of the board or staff of the board shall not attend any prepetition meetings held pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Petitions [1265. - 1274.]

1265.

(a) Any person with a substantial interest in the pilotage tariff may file a petition with the board.

(b) A petitioner filing a petition with the board is a moving party and bears the burden of the preponderance of the evidence in the proceedings as described in this chapter.

(c) A counterpetitioner responding to a petition is a moving party and bears the burden of the preponderance of the evidence in the proceedings as described in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1266.

(a) Provided that the requirements of Sections 1260 and 1262 have been complied with by the petitioner, a petition filing is in order after 90 days of provision of service of a copy of the notice of intent to petition or the reading of the notice of intent to petition at a duly noticed meeting of the board, whichever is earlier.

(b) There is no obligation on a petitioner to file a petition under this chapter after the completion of the prepetition meeting process.

(c) If stakeholder participants in prepetition meetings stipulate that prepetition meetings are continuing, there is no limitation on the
 time to file a petition after the filing of a notice of intent to
 petition.

(d) If no petition is filed within 180 days of the filing of the notice of intent to petition, or if no stipulation is presented to the board under subdivision (c), a petition is no longer in order and a new notice of intent to petition shall be filed prior to a subsequent petition filing pursuant to Section 1260.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1267.

(a) A petition filed under this chapter shall include all of the following components:

(1) (A) A signed submission by the petitioner identifying the petitioner, including the names and contact information of the person requesting the tariff revision and the basis of the petitioner’s substantial interest in the pilotage tariff.

(B) If the petition is a joint submission by multiple parties, the petition shall be identified as a joint submission on the filing and include a signed submission by each of the joint petitioners, including the names and contact information of each of the persons requesting
 the tariff revision and the bases of each of the
 petitioners’ substantial interests in the pilotage tariff.

(2) A request for a hearing, including a proposed hearing date and calendar.

(3) A copy of the proposed tariff, along with a copy of the proposed changes to the tariff in a format in which strikethroughs indicate the material to be deleted or replaced and underlining indicates the material to be inserted.

(4) Testimony in support of the petition, including a description of why or how the existing tariff is not fair, just, reasonable, or sufficient, along with all exhibits and information to demonstrate a need for the tariff revision and addressing the criteria for tariff revisions as set forth in Section 1251.

(5) A copy of any joint stipulations, partial stipulations, or any other agreements to narrow or simplify issues reached during prepetition meetings pursuant to Section 1262.

(b) A petition filed under this chapter may include any of the following:

(1) A copy of a proposed order.

(2) Any other information required by the board by regulation or by previous order.

(c) A petitioner shall file with the board one paper copy and one electronic copy of all petition documents, including testimony and exhibits that the petitioner intends to present as the petitioner’s direct case. An electronic copy
 of all filed material shall be filed in a format identified by the board, if the board elects to require a specified filing format.

(d) A petitioner shall provide electronic notification and access to an electronic copy of all filed material to every stakeholder or interested party who requested to participate in prepetition meetings pursuant to Section 1262.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.

Upon receipt of a petition, the executive director shall do all of the following:

(a) Schedule an item for the next regular meeting of the board for the purposes of providing notice to the public and for the executive director to publish the signed submission and request for a hearing on the petition into the record.

(b) Provide all copies of all filed materials to the administrative law judge assigned upon the request of the board pursuant to Section 1261 for the purpose of administering the hearing on the petition.

(c) Provide notification to the petitioner and to
 every stakeholder who requested to participate in prepetition meetings pursuant to Section 1262 of all of the following:

(1) The name and contact information of the administrative law judge assigned to administer the hearing on the petition.

(2) The official date of the filing of the petition with the board.

(3) The requirement of interested stakeholders to file a request to intervene within 20 calendar days of petition filing pursuant to Section 1269.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1269.

(a) Any stakeholder with a substantial interest in the pilotage tariff may file a written request to intervene in a petition proceeding under this chapter.

(b) A request to intervene shall include all of the following:

(1) A signed request identifying the proposed intervenor, including the names and contact information of the person requesting the intervention.

(2) The proposed intervenor’s substantial interest in the pilotage tariff.

(3) The position of the party in the proceeding.

(4) A response to the petitioner’s proposed hearing date and calendar.

(c) A written request to intervene shall be considered timely if it is received by the administrative law judge within 20 calendar days of petition filing.

(d) Intervention shall not broaden the issues in the proceeding, except to the limited extent that an issue is raised in a counterpetition, nor shall intervention unreasonably delay the hearing or unfairly prejudice the other parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1270.

(a) Any intervening party, or proposed intervening party, shall file an answer, counterpetition, or response within 30 calendar days of petition filing. For good cause shown, the administrative law judge may extend the time for filing an answer, counterpetition, or response for a period not to exceed an additional 20 days.

(b) The answers filed by intervenors, whether counterpetitions or responses, shall address the factors specified in this chapter and all related issues raised in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 16.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1271.

(a) The administrative law judge shall hold an initial petition management conference to set a hearing date, establish a complete petition calendar, rule on requests to intervene, and address any other timely or appropriate business presented by the parties.

(b) (1) In order to make a more effective use of hearing time in formal proceedings and to expedite the orderly conduct and disposition of the proceedings, the administrative law judge shall set a date in the complete petition calendar for at least one prehearing conference between the parties. The parties attending a prehearing conference shall consider, but not be limited to the consideration
 of, all of the following:

(A) Simplifying and clarifying the issues and eliminating irrelevant or immaterial issues.

(B) Obtaining stipulations as to facts, authenticity of documents, admissibility of evidence, and other evidentiary matters.

(C) The use of other aids to the orderly conduct and disposition of the proceeding as may be possible.

(2) This section does not preclude any party from calling or holding off-calendar conferences by agreement or stipulation. If a conference is called before the hearing, or if the hearing is recessed for a conference, and the conference yields an outcome of substance, the administrative law judge shall state on the record the
 results of the conference.

(c) The administrative law judge shall set dates in the complete petition calendar for the parties to conclude all discovery and data requests, respond to discovery and data requests, and lodge any objections to discovery or discovery responses by another party.

(d) (1) The administrative law judge shall set dates in the complete petition calendar for the parties to file proposed written testimony, witness lists, and proposed exhibits with the administrative law judge on a date before the hearing, reserving rights of cross-examination at the hearing.

(2) Any objections to the prefiled testimony, witnesses, or proposed exhibits shall be lodged with the administrative law judge at
 a prehearing date set in the complete petition calendar, and shall be resolved by the administrative law judge at the commencement of the hearing.
